Massachusetts, session 194th, H3225.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of chapter 64 H is hereby amended by inserting after subsection xx, the
following:
(yy) The receipts from the first fifty thousand dollars of the retail sale of a qualifying
zero-emission vehicle. For the purpose of this section, qualified vehicles shall mean a battery
electric vehicle or a fuel cell powered vehicle.
of 1